Utah statutes.
41-6a-2004.   Captured plate data -- Preservation and disclosure.

(1)  Captured plate data obtained for the purposes described in Section 41-6a-2003:

(a)  in accordance with Section 63G-2-305, is a protected record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, if the captured plate data is maintained by a governmental entity;

(b)  may not be used or shared for any purpose other than the purposes described in Section 41-6a-2003;

(c)  may not be preserved for more than 30 days by a private entity or nine months by a governmental entity except pursuant to:

(i)  a preservation request under Section 41-6a-2005;

(ii)  a disclosure order under Subsection 41-6a-2005(2); or

(iii)  a warrant issued under the Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure or an equivalent federal warrant; and

(d)  may only be disclosed:

(i)  in accordance with the disclosure requirements for a protected record under Section 63G-2-202;

(ii)  pursuant to a disclosure order under Subsection 41-6a-2005(2); or

(iii)  pursuant to a warrant issued under the Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure or an equivalent federal warrant.

(2) (a)  A person or governmental entity that is authorized to use an automatic license plate reader system under this part may not sell captured plate data for any purpose.

(b)  A person or governmental entity that is authorized to use an automatic license plate reader system under this part may not share captured plate date for a purpose not authorized under Subsection 41-6a-2003(2).

(c)  Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a governmental entity may preserve and disclose aggregate captured plate data for planning and statistical purposes if the information identifying a specific license plate is not preserved or disclosed.



Enacted by Chapter 447, 2013 General Session

